dev/mt_brokenplurals/appendix1.fat.dix
  <!-- soppa; sop; 2 -->
    <pardef n="sop/pa__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>pa</l>
          <r>pa<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>op</l>
          <r>pa<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- setta; set; 2 -->
    <pardef n="set/ta__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ta</l>
          <r>ta<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>et</l>
          <r>ta<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- belt; b; 2 -->
    <pardef n="b/elt__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>elt</l>
          <r>elt<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>liet</l>
          <r>elt<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- wiċċ; ; 2 -->
    <pardef n="/wiċċ__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>wiċċ</l>
          <r>wiċċ<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>uċuħ</l>
          <r>wiċċ<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- mappa; map; 2 -->
    <pardef n="map/pa__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>pa</l>
          <r>pa<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ep</l>
          <r>pa<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- ġilda; ġ; 2 -->
    <pardef n="ġ/ilda__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ilda</l>
          <r>ilda<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lud</l>
          <r>ilda<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- xahar; x; 2 -->
    <pardef n="x/ahar__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ahar</l>
          <r>ahar<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>hur</l>
          <r>ahar<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- xkaffa; xkaf; 2 -->
    <pardef n="xkaf/fa__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>fa</l>
          <r>fa<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ef</l>
          <r>fa<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- nuffata; n; 4 -->
    <pardef n="n/uffata__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>uffata</l>
          <r>uffata<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>fafat</l>
          <r>uffata<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>fafet</l>
          <r>uffata<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>fiefet</l>
          <r>uffata<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- terħa; t; 2 -->
    <pardef n="t/erħa__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>erħa</l>
          <r>erħa<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rieħi</l>
          <r>erħa<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- żarbuna; ż; 2 -->
    <pardef n="ż/arbuna__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>arbuna</l>
          <r>arbuna<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>raben</l>
          <r>arbuna<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- kitla; k; 2 -->
    <pardef n="k/itla__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>itla</l>
          <r>itla<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tieli</l>
          <r>itla<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- xitwa; x; 2 -->
    <pardef n="x/itwa__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>itwa</l>
          <r>itwa<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tiewi</l>
          <r>itwa<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- qamħ; q; 2 -->
    <pardef n="q/amħ__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>amħ</l>
          <r>amħ<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>muħ</l>
          <r>amħ<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- sengħa; s; 2 -->
    <pardef n="s/engħa__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>engħa</l>
          <r>engħa<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>najja'</l>
          <r>engħa<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- serduq; s; 2 -->
    <pardef n="s/erduq__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>erduq</l>
          <r>erduq<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>riedaq</l>
          <r>erduq<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- lejl; l; 2 -->
    <pardef n="l/ejl__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ejl</l>
          <r>ejl<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jieli</l>
          <r>ejl<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- storja; st; 2 -->
    <pardef n="st/orja__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>orja</l>
          <r>orja<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ejjer</l>
          <r>orja<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- baqra; baq; 2 -->
    <pardef n="baq/ra__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ra</l>
          <r>ra<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ar</l>
          <r>ra<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- qolla; qol; 2 -->
    <pardef n="qol/la__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>la</l>
          <r>la<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ol</l>
          <r>la<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- ċoff; ċ; 2 -->
    <pardef n="ċ/off__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>off</l>
          <r>off<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>fuf</l>
          <r>off<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- muntun; m; 2 -->
    <pardef n="m/untun__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>untun</l>
          <r>untun<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>taten</l>
          <r>untun<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- kċina; kċ; 2 -->
    <pardef n="kċ/ina__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ina</l>
          <r>ina<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ejjen</l>
          <r>ina<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- ferq; f; 2 -->
    <pardef n="f/erq__adj_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>erq</l>
          <r>erq<s n="adj"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ruq</l>
          <r>erq<s n="adj"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="soppa"><i>sop</i><par n="sop/pa__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="setta"><i>set</i><par n="set/ta__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="belt"><i>b</i><par n="b/elt__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="wiċċ"><i></i><par n="/wiċċ__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="mappa"><i>map</i><par n="map/pa__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="ġilda"><i>ġ</i><par n="ġ/ilda__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="xahar"><i>x</i><par n="x/ahar__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="xkaffa"><i>xkaf</i><par n="xkaf/fa__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="nuffata"><i>n</i><par n="n/uffata__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="terħa"><i>t</i><par n="t/erħa__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="żarbuna"><i>ż</i><par n="ż/arbuna__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="kitla"><i>k</i><par n="k/itla__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="xitwa"><i>x</i><par n="x/itwa__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="qamħ"><i>q</i><par n="q/amħ__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="sengħa"><i>s</i><par n="s/engħa__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="serduq"><i>s</i><par n="s/erduq__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="lejl"><i>l</i><par n="l/ejl__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="storja"><i>st</i><par n="st/orja__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="baqra"><i>baq</i><par n="baq/ra__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="qolla"><i>qol</i><par n="qol/la__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="ċoff"><i>ċ</i><par n="ċ/off__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="muntun"><i>m</i><par n="m/untun__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="kċina"><i>kċ</i><par n="kċ/ina__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="ferq"><i>f</i><par n="f/erq__adj_GD"/></e>
